Utah statutes.
39-6-65.   Finality of military court judgments.

(1)  The proceedings, findings, and sentence a military court has reviewed and approved under this chapter, and all dismissals and discharges executed under sentences by military court following review and approval under this chapter, are final and conclusive.

(2)  Orders publishing the proceedings of military court and all action taken pursuant to those proceedings are binding upon all departments, courts, agencies, and officers of the state, subject only to action upon a petition for new trial under Section 39-6-62.

